Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.090

When publications or electronic communications not deemed offers to sell or buy in this state.

(1) For the purpose of RCW 21.30.080, an offer to sell or to buy is not made in this state when the publisher circulates or there is circulated on his or her behalf in this state in any bona fide newspaper or other publication of general, regular, and paid circulation, which is not published in this state, an offer to sell or to buy that is reasonably calculated to solicit only persons outside this state and not to solicit persons in this state.

(2) For the purpose of RCW 21.30.080, an offer to sell or to buy is not made in this state when a radio or television program or other electronic communication originating outside this state is received in this state and the offer to sell or to buy is reasonably calculated to solicit only persons outside this state and not to solicit persons in this state.

[ 2011 c 336 s 597; 1986 c 14 s 9.]